District of Columbia statutes.
47-1016

Corcoran Gallery of Art — Real property and works of art.

The buildings described in a certain deed from William W. Corcoran to the trustees of the Corcoran Gallery of Art, dated May 10, 1869, and recorded May 18, 1869, in liber D, no. 8, folio 294 et seq., one of the land records of Washington County, District of Columbia, and the grounds connected therewith, together with all of the works of art that may be contained therein, shall be free from all taxes and assessments by the municipal authorities, or by the United States, so long as the same shall be held and used for the purposes set forth in said deed.

May 24, 1870, 16 Stat. 139, ch. 111, § 4
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1016.
1973 Ed., § 47-809.